Hawaii statutes.
[§672B-2] Administration of chapter.
The director shall be responsible for the implementation and administration of
this chapter and shall adopt rules, in conformity with chapter 91, necessary
for the purposes of this chapter. [L 2007, c 207, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next